Nebraska, session 109, LB522.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB522 LB522
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 48-119, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
48-119 No compensation shall be allowed for the first three seven
calendar days of disability, except as provided in section 48-120, but if
disability extends beyond the period of three seven calendar days,
compensation shall begin on the fourth eighth calendar day of disability,
except that if such disability continues for two six weeks or longer,
compensation shall be computed from the date disability began. For
purposes of this section, a partial day of disability shall be deemed a
calendar day of disability.
Sec. 2. Section 48-121, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
48-121 The following schedule of compensation is hereby established
for injuries resulting in disability:
(1) For total disability, the compensation during such disability
shall be sixty-six and two-thirds percent of the wages received at the
time of injury, but such compensation shall not be more than the maximum
weekly income benefit specified in section 48-121.01 nor less than the
minimum weekly income benefit specified in section 48-121.01, except that
if at the time of injury the employee receives wages of less than the
minimum weekly income benefit specified in section 48-121.01, then he or
she shall receive the full amount of such wages per week as compensation.
Nothing in this subdivision shall require payment of compensation after
disability shall cease;
(2) For disability partial in character, except the particular cases
mentioned in subdivision (3) of this section, the compensation shall be
sixty-six and two-thirds percent of the difference between the wages
received at the time of the injury and the earning power of the employee
thereafter, but such compensation shall not be more than the maximum
weekly income benefit specified in section 48-121.01. This compensation
shall be paid during the period of such partial disability but not beyond
-2-

LB522 LB522
2025 2025
three hundred weeks. Should total disability be followed by partial
disability, the period of three hundred weeks mentioned in this
subdivision shall be reduced by the number of weeks during which
compensation was paid for such total disability;
(3) For disability resulting from permanent injury of the classes
listed in this subdivision, the compensation shall be in addition to the
amount paid for temporary disability, except that the compensation for
temporary disability shall cease as soon as the extent of the permanent
disability is ascertainable. For disability resulting from permanent
injury of the following classes, compensation shall be: For the loss of a
thumb, sixty-six and two-thirds percent of daily wages during sixty
weeks. For the loss of a first finger, commonly called the index finger,
sixty-six and two-thirds percent of daily wages during thirty-five weeks.
For the loss of a second finger, sixty-six and two-thirds percent of
daily wages during thirty weeks. For the loss of a third finger, sixty-
six and two-thirds percent of daily wages during twenty weeks. For the
loss of a fourth finger, commonly called the little finger, sixty-six and
two-thirds percent of daily wages during fifteen weeks. The loss of the
first phalange of the thumb or of any finger shall be considered to be
equal to the loss of one-half of such thumb or finger and compensation
shall be for one-half of the periods of time above specified, and the
compensation for the loss of one-half of the first phalange shall be for
one-fourth of the periods of time above specified. The loss of more than
one phalange shall be considered as the loss of the entire finger or
thumb, except that in no case shall the amount received for more than one
finger exceed the amount provided in this schedule for the loss of a
hand. For the loss of a great toe, sixty-six and two-thirds percent of
daily wages during thirty weeks. For the loss of one of the toes other
than the great toe, sixty-six and two-thirds percent of daily wages
during ten weeks. The loss of the first phalange of any toe shall be
considered equal to the loss of one-half of such toe, and compensation
-3-

LB522 LB522
2025 2025
shall be for one-half of the periods of time above specified. The loss of
more than one phalange shall be considered as the loss of the entire toe.
For the loss of a hand, sixty-six and two-thirds percent of daily wages
during one hundred seventy-five weeks. For the loss of an arm, sixty-six
and two-thirds percent of daily wages during two hundred twenty-five
weeks. For the loss of a foot, sixty-six and two-thirds percent of daily
wages during one hundred fifty weeks. For the loss of a leg, sixty-six
and two-thirds percent of daily wages during two hundred fifteen weeks.
For the loss of an eye, sixty-six and two-thirds percent of daily wages
during one hundred twenty-five weeks. For the loss of an ear, sixty-six
and two-thirds percent of daily wages during twenty-five weeks. For the
loss of hearing in one ear, sixty-six and two-thirds percent of daily
wages during fifty weeks. For the loss of the nose, sixty-six and two-
thirds percent of daily wages during fifty weeks.
In any case in which there is a loss or loss of use of more than one
member or parts of more than one member set forth in this subdivision,
but not amounting to total and permanent disability, compensation
benefits shall be paid for the loss or loss of use of each such member or
part thereof, with the periods of benefits to run consecutively. The
total loss or permanent total loss of use of both hands, or both arms, or
both feet, or both legs, or both eyes, or hearing in both ears, or of any
two thereof, in one accident, shall constitute total and permanent
disability and be compensated for according to subdivision (1) of this
section. In all other cases involving a loss or loss of use of both
hands, both arms, both feet, both legs, both eyes, or hearing in both
ears, or of any two thereof, total and permanent disability shall be
determined in accordance with the facts. Amputation between the elbow and
the wrist shall be considered as the equivalent of the loss of a hand,
and amputation between the knee and the ankle shall be considered as the
equivalent of the loss of a foot. Amputation at or above the elbow shall
be considered as the loss of an arm, and amputation at or above the knee
-4-

LB522 LB522
2025 2025
shall be considered as the loss of a leg. Permanent total loss of the use
of a finger, hand, arm, foot, leg, or eye shall be considered as the
equivalent of the loss of such finger, hand, arm, foot, leg, or eye. In
all cases involving a permanent partial loss of the use or function of
any of the members mentioned in this subdivision, the compensation shall
bear such relation to the amounts named in such subdivision as the
disabilities bear to those produced by the injuries named therein.
If, in the compensation court's discretion, compensation benefits
payable for a loss or loss of use of more than one hand, arm, foot, or
leg, or any combination thereof, resulting from the same accident or
illness, do not adequately compensate the employee for such loss or loss
of use and such loss or loss of use results in at least a thirty percent
loss of earning capacity, the compensation court shall, upon request of
the employee, determine the employee's loss of earning capacity
consistent with the process for such determination under subdivision (1)
or (2) of this section, and in such a case the employee shall not be
entitled to compensation under this subdivision. Loss or loss of use of
multiple parts of the same arm, including the hand and fingers, or loss
or loss of use of multiple parts of the same leg, including the foot and
toes, resulting from the same accident or illness shall not entitle the
employee to compensation under subdivision (1) or (2) of this section.
If the employer and the employee are unable to agree upon the amount
of compensation to be paid in cases not covered by the schedule, the
amount of compensation shall be settled according to sections 48-173 to
48-185. Compensation under this subdivision shall not be more than the
maximum weekly income benefit specified in section 48-121.01 nor less
than the minimum weekly income benefit specified in section 48-121.01,
except that if at the time of the injury the employee received wages of
less than the minimum weekly income benefit specified in section
48-121.01, then he or she shall receive the full amount of such wages per
week as compensation;
-5-

LB522 LB522
2025 2025
(4) For disability resulting from permanent disability, if
immediately prior to the accident the rate of wages was fixed by the day
or hour, or by the output of the employee, the weekly wages shall be
taken to be computed upon the basis of a workweek of a minimum of five
days, if the wages are paid by the day, or upon the basis of a workweek
of a minimum of forty hours, if the wages are paid by the hour, or upon
the basis of a workweek of a minimum of five days or forty hours,
whichever results in the higher weekly wage, if the wages are based on
the output of the employee; and
(5) The employee shall be entitled to compensation from his or her
employer for temporary disability while undergoing physical or medical
rehabilitation and while undergoing vocational rehabilitation whether
such vocational rehabilitation is voluntarily offered by the employer and
accepted by the employee or is ordered by the Nebraska Workers'
Compensation Court or any judge of the compensation court; and .
(6)(a) Beginning in 2026, weekly income benefits under this section
lasting longer than twelve months shall be adjusted to account for
increases in the cost of living.
(b) For purposes of this subdivision (6), COLA percentage means the
greater of:
(i) One percent; or
(ii) The percentage change, for the most recent twelve-month period
for which information is available, in the Consumer Price Index for Urban
Wage Earners and Clerical Workers, as prepared by the United States
Department of Labor, Bureau of Labor Statistics.
(c) On January 1, 2026, and on each January 1 thereafter, the
Nebraska Workers' Compensation Court shall determine the COLA percentage
that will apply for such calendar year.
(d) If a person receives a weekly income benefit under this section
that lasts longer than twelve months, the person's weekly income benefit
shall be automatically adjusted at the end of each twelve-month period.
-6-

LB522 LB522
2025 2025
The adjusted amount shall equal the then-current weekly income benefit
amount multiplied by the COLA percentage in effect for that calendar
year. The adjusted amount shall be computed to the next higher whole
dollar amount. Such adjusted amount shall apply for the next twelve-month
period.
(e) The cost-of-living adjustment provided for in this subdivision
(6) shall not result in a weekly income benefit that is more than the
maximum weekly income benefit specified in section 48-121.01 that is in
effect at the time the adjustment is made.
Sec. 3. Section 48-122.01, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
48-122.01 Compensation under section 48-122 shall be payable in the
amount and to the following persons subject to the maximum limits
specified in sections 48-122 and 48-122.03:
(1) If there is a widow or widower and no children of the deceased,
as defined in section 48-124, to such widow or widower, sixty-six and
two-thirds percent of the average weekly wage of the deceased, during
widowhood or widowerhood;
(2) To the widow or widower, if there is a child or children living
with the widow or widower, sixty percent of the average weekly wage of
the deceased, or fifty-five percent, if such child is not or such
children are not living with a widow or widower, and, in addition
thereto, fifteen percent for each child. When there are two or more such
children, the indemnity benefits payable on account of such children
shall be divided among such children, share and share alike;
(3) Two years' indemnity benefits in one lump sum shall be payable
to a widow or widower upon remarriage;
(4) To the children, if there is no widow or widower, sixty-six and
two-thirds percent of such wage for one child, and fifteen percent for
each additional child, divided among such children, share and share
alike;
-7-

LB522 LB522
2025 2025
(5) The income benefits payable on account of any child under this
section shall cease when he or she dies, marries, or reaches the age of
nineteen, or when a child over such age ceases to be physically or
mentally incapable of self-support, or if actually dependent ceases to be
actually dependent, or, if enrolled as a full-time student in any
accredited educational institution, ceases to be so enrolled or reaches
the age of twenty-five. A child who originally qualified as a dependent
by virtue of being less than nineteen years of age may, upon reaching age
nineteen, continue to qualify if he or she satisfies the tests of being
physically or mentally incapable of self-support, actual dependency, or
enrollment in an educational institution;
(6) To each parent, if actually dependent, twenty-five percent;
(7) To the brothers, sisters, grandparents, and grandchildren, if
actually dependent, twenty-five percent to each such dependent. If there
should be more than one of such dependents, the total income benefits
payable on account of such dependents shall be divided share and share
alike;
(8) The income benefits of each beneficiary under subdivisions (6)
and (7) of this section shall be paid until he or she, if a parent or
grandparent, dies, marries, or ceases to be actually dependent, or, if a
brother, sister, or grandchild, dies, marries, or reaches the age of
nineteen or if over that age ceases to be physically or mentally
incapable of self-support, or ceases to be actually dependent; and
(9) A person ceases to be actually dependent when his or her income
from all sources exclusive of workers' compensation income benefits is
such that, if it had existed at the time as of which the original
determination of actual dependency was made, it would not have supported
a finding of dependency. In any event, if the present annual income of an
actual dependent person including workers' compensation income benefits
at any time exceeds the total annual support received by the person from
the deceased employee, the workers' compensation benefits shall be
-8-

LB522 LB522
2025 2025
reduced so that the total annual income is no greater than such amount of
annual support received from the deceased employee. In all cases, a
person found to be actually dependent shall be presumed to be no longer
actually dependent three years after each time as of which the person was
found to be actually dependent. This presumption may be overcome by proof
of continued actual dependency as defined in this subdivision and section
48-124; and .
(10)(a) Beginning in 2026, weekly income benefits under this section
lasting longer than twelve months shall be adjusted to account for
increases in the cost of living.
(b) For purposes of this subdivision (10), COLA percentage means the
greater of:
(i) One percent; or
(ii) The percentage change, for the most recent twelve-month period
for which information is available, in the Consumer Price Index for Urban
Wage Earners and Clerical Workers, as prepared by the United States
Department of Labor, Bureau of Labor Statistics.
(c) On January 1, 2026, and on each January 1 thereafter, the
Nebraska Workers' Compensation Court shall determine the COLA percentage
that will apply for such calendar year.
(d) If a person receives a weekly income benefit under this section
that lasts longer than twelve months, the person's weekly income benefit
shall be automatically adjusted at the end of each twelve-month period.
The adjusted amount shall equal the then-current weekly income benefit
amount multiplied by the COLA percentage in effect for that calendar
year. The adjusted amount shall be computed to the next higher whole
dollar amount. Such adjusted amount shall apply for the next twelve-month
period.
(e) The cost-of-living adjustment provided for in this subdivision
(10) shall not result in a weekly income benefit that is more than the
maximum weekly income benefit specified in section 48-122 that is in
-9-

LB522 LB522
2025 2025
effect at the time the adjustment is made.
(f) The maximum limitation in section 48-122.03 shall not limit
increases in the weekly income benefit resulting from the cost-of-living
adjustment provided for in this subdivision (10).
Sec. 4. Original sections 48-119 and 48-122.01, Reissue Revised
Statutes of Nebraska, and section 48-121, Revised Statutes Cumulative
Supplement, 2024, are repealed.
-10-